California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
66626.

Every handler is primarily and personally liable for the payment of an assessment. Any handler who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, 2 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance. The penalty and interest are required to be paid to the commission and are available for expenditure in the same manner as an assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 555, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Actions and Penalties [66641. - 66646.]

66641.

The commission may, if it finds a violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation has occurred, or in the event of nonpayment of any assessment, bring a proceeding as provided under Section 66644 in its name for collection of such assessment, civil penalties, or for injunctive relief, including specific performance, or enforcement of any obligation imposed by this chapter or any rule or regulation issued thereunder, or both, against any person violating any provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief. A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified by Section 485.010 is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or of inadequate remedy at law specified by Section 526 or 527 is not required.

Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the commodity subject to this chapter until payment of the judgment is made in full by the defendant to the commission.

In any such proceeding, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the commission therein and shall, upon entry of any final judgment, enjoin any such handler from further handling until payment is made for any judgment entered for money, and from further violating or aiding in violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission. No such proceeding may be commenced until the commission has exhausted its administrative procedures prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

66642.

Any person aggrieved by any action of the commission may appeal to the director. The director shall review the record of the proceedings before the commission. If the director finds that the record shows by substantial evidence that the commission’s action was not an abuse of discretion or illegal, he shall dismiss such appeal. If he finds such action is not substantially sustained by the record, was an abuse of discretion, or illegal, he may reverse the action of the commission.

Any such decision of the director is subject to judicial review upon petition of the commission or any party aggrieved by the decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------

66643.

Any person subject to this chapter and aggrieved by any provision of this chapter or by any rule or order of the commission shall comply with and exhaust the appeal procedure prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission, before application is made to any court for relief therefrom. The decision of the commission unless illegal, arbitrary, or without evidentiary support, shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------

66644.

Any proceeding by the commission to enforce this chapter or by a handler applying for relief from rules, orders, or regulations of the commission may be commenced either in the county in which the defendant or any of the defendants reside or in which any act or omission or part thereof complained of occurred, or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 958, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

66645.

It shall be a misdemeanor to do any of the following:

(a) For any person to violate or aid in the violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission.

(b) For any person to willfully render or furnish a false or fraudulent report, statement, or record required by the commission pursuant to this chapter or any rules or regulations of the commission.

(c) For any person engaged in the handling of iceberg lettuce to fail or refuse to furnish to the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the names and addresses of the persons from whom he or she has received iceberg lettuce and the quantity of the commodity so received. 

(d) For any person to secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 958, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

66646.

The commission shall have the right to inspect the premises, books, records, documents, and all other instruments of any carrier, railroad, truck, boat, grower, shipper, handler, dealer, or retailer, to the extent the premises, books, records, documents and other instruments pertain to persons subject to the chapter for the purpose of enforcing this chapter and collecting the assessments levied under authority of this chapter. In the event of refusal of any person to allow the inspection, the commission may apply to any court for the issuance of a subpoena to compel such an inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 958, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Suspension of Operations [66661. - 66664.]

66661.

Upon the finding of nine of the members of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the director that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, the suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the fiscal year then current. The director shall, upon receipt of the recommendation, or may, after holding a public hearing to review a petition that was filed with him or her requesting the suspension, signed by 20 percent of the handlers as defined in Section 66532, cause a vote among handlers as defined in Section 66532, to determine if the operation and the operations of the commission should be suspended, and shall establish a period, which shall not be less than 30 nor more than 90 days after receipt by the director of the petition. The director may prescribe any additional procedure that may be necessary to conduct the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 555, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

66662.

At the close of the voting period established, the director shall tabulate the ballots filed during such period. If at least 65 percent of the handlers have assented in writing for such suspension, and the handlers so voting marketed at least a majority of the total quantity of iceberg lettuce marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers who voted, or the majority of the handlers handling 65 percent of the total quantity of iceberg lettuce marketed in the preceding marketing season, the director shall declare the operation of the provisions of this chapter and of the commission suspended, effective upon expiration of the current fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------

66663.

After the effective date of suspension of the operation of the provisions of this chapter and of the commission, as provided in Section 66662, the operations of the commission shall be wound up and any moneys remaining held by the commission, collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of winding up and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all handlers from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding current fiscal year. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so de minimis as to make impractical the computation and remitting of such pro rata refund to such handlers, any moneys remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust moneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

66664.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, as provided in Sections 66662 and 66663, a notice thereof shall be posted on a public bulletin board to be maintained by the director in his or her office, and a copy of such notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in each district. The director shall also mail a copy of the notice of suspension to any producers, shippers, and handlers affected by such suspension whose names and addresses are on file with the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Miscellaneous [66681. - 66684.]

66681.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to any order, rule, or regulation issued or issuable by the Public Utilities Commission or the Interstate Commerce Commission with respect to the operation of common carriers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

66682.

In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or any rule of statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, proof that the act complained of was done in compliance with this chapter, or a rule or regulation of the commission issued pursuant thereto, and in furtherance of purposes and provisions thereof, shall be a complete defense to the action or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 555, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

66683.

The commission shall reimburse to the director all expenses incurred by the director in carrying out his duties and responsibilities under this chapter, except for the expenses incurred for any action under Section 66561.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------

66684.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any section, clause, or part of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid as applied to any person or as applied under certain circumstances, such decision shall not affect the remaining portions of this chapter nor the application of this chapter to any other persons or under any other circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Continuation [66701. - 66701.]

66701.

Between January 1 and March 31 of each fifth calendar year commencing with the year 1982, the director shall cause a vote to be conducted among handlers, as defined in Section 66532, in the manner prescribed in Section 66601 to determine whether the operations of this chapter shall be reapproved and continued effective. If a favorable vote has been given, the director shall so certify and announce to the commission and all provisions of this chapter shall remain in effect. If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall certify and announce that fact to the commission, and he or she shall declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the current fiscal year ending March 31. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be wound up and funds distributed in the manner provided in Sections 66663 and 66664. No bond or security is required for any referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 555, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. California Avocado Commission [67001. - 67143.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [67001. - 67006.]

67001.

Avocados produced in this state constitute one of the state’s principal tree fruit crops. The avocado industry in this state is expanding. The industry constitutes an important source of jobs for many people in the state, a high proportion of whom are from underprivileged and historically deprived segments of the population.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

67002.

Opportunity exists for continued growth and expansion of the industry, by creating new markets. The success of an expansion program is uniquely dependent upon effective advertising, promotion, and collection and dissemination of public information, since the creation of new markets is essentially a matter of educating and
 informing people of the use, nutritional value, and availability of avocados.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 1.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

67003.

The establishment of a commission is imperative for the efficient development and management of a national and international advertising program which will ensure that the California avocado industry can compete successfully in the marketplace and increase revenues to avocado producers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

67004.

The production and marketing of avocados produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

67005.

The commission form of administration created by this chapter is uniquely situated to provide those engaged in the production of avocados the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in the broad fields of advertising; promotion; production, nutrition, and marketing research; quality and maturity standards; the collection and dissemination of crop volume and related statistics; and public education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

67006.

No action taken by the commission, or by any person in accordance with this chapter or with rules or regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [67021. - 67040.5.]

67021.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

67022.

“Avocado” means any variety of avocado produced in the state, including any avocado delivered to a processor for processing into any avocado product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

67023.

“Books and records” mean books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

67025.

“Commission” means the California Avocado Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

67026.

“Ex officio members” means nonvoting members of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 5.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

67028.

(a) (1) “Handler” means any person who engages, in this state, in the operation of selling, marketing, or distributing avocados which he or she has produced or purchased or acquired from a producer, or which he or she is marketing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise.

(2) “Handler” also includes any person engaged as a processor in the business of processing avocados.

(b) When the handler is a corporation or a limited liability company, all of the directors, officers, managers, and members of the corporation or limited liability company in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for failure to collect or make payment of assessments to which a corporate handler or a handler that is a limited liability company may be subject pursuant to this chapter shall include identical liability upon each individual director, officer, manager, or member of the corporation or limited liability company.

(c) (1) “Handler” does not include a cooperative bargaining association that recommends that its members market their avocados through specified handlers and which otherwise is not involved in the sale of avocados.

(2) “Handler” also does not include a retailer, except for a retailer who purchases or acquires from any producer, or handles on behalf of any producer, avocados which were not previously subjected to regulation by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

67030.

“Handle” means to engage in the business of a handler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

67034.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the sale or inventory of avocados.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1279, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

67035.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning November 1 of any year and extending through the last day of October of the following year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

67036.5.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other business entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

67037.

“Processor” means any person engaged, within this state, in any of the activities with respect to avocados as set forth in Section 58619.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

67038.

“Process” means to engage in the business of a processor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

67039.

“Producer” or “grower” means any person who is engaged within this state in the business of producing, or causing to be produced, avocados for market. “Producer” or “grower” does not include any person who has an average annual production of less than 10,000 pounds of avocados in the three preceding marketing years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 451, Sec. 4.   (AB 1976)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

67040.

“Production research” means any research related to the production of avocados other than marketing research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

67040.5.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Districts [67041. - 67042.]

67041.

The commission shall establish no fewer than three districts and no more than five districts within the state, each representing approximately the same percentage of avocado production in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 2.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

67042.

Beginning in the 2000–01 marketing season, districts shall be reapportioned every fifth year in accordance with redistricting procedures adopted by a two-thirds vote of the commission and concurred in by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 3.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Avocado Commission [67051. - 67062.]

67051.

(a) There is in the state government the California Avocado Commission.

(b) The commission shall be composed of the following members:

(1) (A) If the commission consists of three districts, nine producers who are not handlers, three elected from each district.

(B) If the commission consists of four districts, eight producers who are not handlers, two elected from each district.

(C) If the commission consists of five districts, 10 producers who are not handlers, two elected from each district.

(2) Two avocado handlers elected on a statewide basis.

(3) One public member who shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission.

(4) The secretary who shall be a nonvoting ex officio member of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 451, Sec. 5.   (AB 1976)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

67051.5.

The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any activity or function which is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or is in violation of this chapter.

If the commission refuses or fails to cease the activities or functions or to make corrections as required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary have been accomplished.

Any written notice, to cease any activity which is the subject of a contract of the commission entered into by the commission prior to the notice, shall not be effective until after the period of notice for termination provided in the contract or 120 days, whichever is shorter.

Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing, of the specific acts which he or she determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

67051.6.

Either the commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

67052.

(a) Each district shall have one alternate producer member, to be elected in the same manner as producer members.

(b) The alternate producer member shall, in the absence of a producer member from the same district, serve in place of the absent producer member on the commission and shall have, and be able to exercise, all the rights, privileges, and powers of the producer member when serving on the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 6.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

67052.3.

(a) There shall be one alternate handler member to be elected in the same manner as the handler members.

(b) The alternate handler member shall, in the absence of a handler member, sit in place of the absent handler member on the commission and shall have, and be able to exercise, all the rights, privileges, and powers of the handler member when sitting on the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 451, Sec. 8.   (AB 1976)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

67052.5.

(a) There shall be one alternate public member who shall be appointed by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission.

(b) The alternate public member shall, in the absence of the public member, serve in place of the absent public member on the commission and shall have, and be able to exercise, all the rights, privileges, and powers of the public member when serving on the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 7.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

67053.

(a) Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or through death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled, for the unexpired portion of the term, by a majority vote of the commission.

(b) Any person filling a vacant member or alternate member position shall meet all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to fill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 451, Sec. 9.   (AB 1976)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

67054.

(a) Producer members and alternate producer members on the commission shall have a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, avocados for market. In order to be elected a member or alternate member, a producer shall, at the time of the election, have a financial interest in the production of avocados within the district in which the producer stands for election.

(b) A producer may stand for election in any district in which the producer has a financial interest in the production of avocados.

(c) Handler members and the alternate handler members shall have a financial interest in handling avocados for markets. To be nominated
 and elected, a handler or alternate handler shall handle no less than 1 percent of the total industry volume of avocados in the preceding marketing year. A handler elected to the commission pursuant to this section shall be required to maintain their eligibility under this section during their entire term of office.

(d) The public member and alternate member shall not have any financial interest in the avocado industry. Except for the nomination of another public member, the public member and
 their alternate member on the commission shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member on the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

67055.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), the term of office of all members and alternate members, except the ex officio member, shall be for two years from the date of their election or appointment
 and until their successors are
 qualified.

(b) Of the first members of the commission from each district, one shall serve for one year, and the remaining member or members shall serve for two years, with the determination of the term of each member to be made by lot. Subsequent to the election of the first
 members from each district,
 the terms of the members shall continue to be staggered, as provided in this subdivision.

(c) Terms of office of each member and alternate member shall be limited to four consecutive terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 12.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

67056.

The commission shall have the power to sue and be sued and to contract and be contracted with.
 Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when certified by an officer, are admissible in evidence in all courts of the state, and are prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 13.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

67057.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chair, one or more vice chair, and other officers it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties as may be delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 9.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

67058.

The commission shall have the power to appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

67059.

Unless otherwise specified, a quorum of the commission shall be any nine voting members if the commission consists of three or four districts and any 10 voting members if the commission consists of five districts. The vote of a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 451, Sec. 11.   (AB 1976)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

67059.5.

The secretary or the secretary’s representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 10.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

67060.

A member, alternate member, or member of a committee who is a nonmember of the commission shall not receive a
 salary, but may receive a sum of not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission, for each day spent in actual attendance at or in traveling to and from meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on authorized assignment for the commission, together with the necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 15.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

67061.

All moneys received by any person from the assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission, shall be deposited in such financial institutions as the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through a member, officer, or employee designated for that purpose. Any such person shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business as such in the State of California, in favor of the commission, conditioned upon the strict accounting of all funds of the commission in the penal sum of not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

67062.

The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts, except for state-directed supervision of the avocado inspection program, as specified in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 44971) of Division 17, which is performed under an agreement that specifies that each of the parties shall be responsible and liable for that party’s decisions made pursuant to the agreement, and that each of the parties shall not be held liable by the other party for the decisions made pursuant to the agreement. Payment of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission shall be limited to the funds collected by the commission. A member of the commission or alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, shall not be personally
 liable on the contracts of the commission nor shall a member, alternate member, or employee of the commission be responsible individually in any way to a producer or handler or any other person for error in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. A member or alternate member shall not be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any member of the commission. The liability of the members and alternate members shall be several and not joint, and a member or alternate member shall not be liable for the default of any other members or alternate members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 11.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Voting Procedures [67081. - 67082.]

67081.

(a) The secretary shall establish a list of producers in each district. In establishing the lists, the secretary shall require that handlers in the state submit the names, mailing addresses, grove location, and handled volume of each producer from whom they purchased or handled avocados in the preceding marketing season. The request for information from handlers shall be in writing and shall be filed by the handlers within 60 days following receipt of the written request.

(b) Any producer of avocados whose name does not appear upon the secretary’s list of producers may have his or her name established on the list by filing with the commission a signed statement, identifying himself
 or herself as a producer. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the producer from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 451, Sec. 12.   (AB 1976)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

67082.

Persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to nomination and election procedures adopted by the commission and concurred in by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 12.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Duties and Powers of the Commission [67091. - 67095.]

67091.

The powers and duties of the commission include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Adopt and, from time to time, alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary procedures to carry out this chapter and in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties, including the adoption of procedures to regulate appeals from any
 action of the commission.

(b) Administer and enforce this chapter, and to do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to or in connection with or deemed reasonably necessary, proper, or advisable to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Employ a person, to serve, at the pleasure of the commission, as president and chief executive officer of the commission and other personnel, including legal counsel.

(d) Establish offices, incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, and create liabilities and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments that may be necessary, at the discretion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter
 and the performance of its duties.

(e) Keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which books, records, and accounts are subject to an annual independent audit by an auditing firm approved by the secretary. The independent audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all producers and handlers of avocados, copies of which shall also be submitted to the Legislature. In addition, the secretary may, as the secretary determines necessary, conduct, or cause to be conducted, a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(f) Promote the sale of avocados by advertising and other promotional means for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for avocados and to educate and
 instruct the public with respect to avocados and the uses of the several varieties and the healthful properties and nutritional value of avocados.

(g) Enter into cost-sharing advertising with other products considered, by the commission, to be fair and equitable to both parties.

(h) Educate and instruct the wholesale and retail trade with respect to proper methods of handling and selling avocados; arrange for the performance of dealer service work providing display and other promotional materials; make market and inventory surveys and analyses; present facts to and negotiate with state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters which affect the avocado industry; and undertake any other activities that the commission may determine appropriate for the maintenance and
 expansion of present markets and the creation of new markets for avocados.

(i) Make, in the name of the commission, contracts to render service in formulating and conducting plans and programs, and any other contracts or agreements that the commission may deem necessary for the promotion of the sale of avocados.

(j) Conduct and contract with others to conduct scientific research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from the research or elsewhere respecting the inventory, marketing, and distribution of avocados. The results of any research conducted by or on behalf of the commission may be used by the commission in any way it deems appropriate, and notwithstanding any other law, may be maintained in confidence
 by the commission and not disseminated to any person not subject to this chapter.

(k) Accept and match contributions of private, local, state, or federal funds and make contributions of commission funds to other persons or to local, state, or federal agencies for purposes of promoting, enhancing, and maintaining the California avocado industry.

(l) Publish and distribute without charge, a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information relating to inventory, marketing, and other information of value to the commission and the avocado industry to producers, handlers, and the public.

(m) Establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(n) Establish an annual budget.

(o) Investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(p) Carry out the requirements prescribed in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 44971) of Division 17.

(q) To provide to the secretary, on a quarterly basis, a summary of the programs, activities, and costs under review for the next marketing season.
